Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

5-2-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as "Uniform Consumer Credit Code - Finance Charges and Related Provisions".

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1195, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-101, as it existed prior to 2000.

5-2-102. Scope.

For purposes of this article, "consumer credit transaction" applies to consumer loans, including supervised loans, consumer credit sales, and refinancing and consolidations of these transactions but does not include consumer leases except for the charges and procedures in sections 5-2-202 and 5-2-203. The provisions concerning credit card surcharges contained in section 5-2-212 apply to all sales and leases.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1195, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1141), ch. 41, p. 157, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 5-2-102, as it existed prior to 2000.